Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1023
Consolidation of districts; petition; filing; notice; contents; hearing.

Whenever a petition as provided in section 46-1022 is filed with the county clerk, the county clerk shall thereupon give notice to the county board of the filing and pendency of such petition and the county board shall forthwith fix a time and place within thirty days after the date of filing of the petition for a hearing of the same, and the county clerk shall, at least seven days before the date fixed for such hearing, give or send by registered or certified mail written notice thereof to the chairperson of each district seeking consolidation and shall transmit to the Chief Water Officer one copy of the petition and notice of the time and place the same is set for hearing. The county clerk shall also, at least seven days before the date fixed for such hearing, cause a notice of the hearing to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. The published notice shall (1) identify by name the districts seeking consolidation; (2) state the time and place of the hearing; (3) state that all interested persons may appear and be heard; and (4) state that a consolidated water district shall have no power or authority to levy any taxes whatsoever.

Laws 1972, LB 1502, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 233;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 256.